District of Columbia statutes.
47-1818.07

First Source employment; inapplicable.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the requirements of subchapter X of Chapter 2 of Title 2 [§ 2-219.01 et seq.] pertaining to government-assisted non-construction projects shall not apply to a Qualified Social E-Commerce Company receiving a benefit pursuant to this subchapter; specifically, § 2-219.03(e)(1), pertaining to government-assisted non-construction projects, and § 2-219.03(e)(1C), pertaining to hiring and reporting requirements in government-assisted non-construction projects.

Oct. 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-174, § 2, 59 DCR 8712